Maine, session 132, LD1430.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11154, sub-§5, as repealed and replaced by PL 2017, c. 427,
§14 and affected by §19, is amended to read:
5. Eligibility. Except as provided in this subsection, a resident or nonresident who is
eligible to obtain a Maine hunting license or who will be eligible to obtain a Maine hunting
license by the opening day of the open moose season is eligible to apply for a moose hunting
permit. A person who has obtained a moose hunting permit is ineligible to obtain another
permit until the 4th calendar year after the issuance of the last permit. This limitation does
not apply to subpermittees under subsection 7 or transferors and transferees under
subsection 16. A person under 10 years of age on the opening day of the open moose
season is eligible to apply for a moose hunting permit and may accrue points under
subsection 8 but is ineligible to receive a moose hunting permit.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §11154, sub-§16, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 191, §1, is amended
to read:
16. Moose permit transfer; disabled veterans. A person who holds a valid moose
permit may transfer, in accordance with this subsection, that permit to a disabled veteran
who meets the eligibility and permit requirements under this section and section 10853,
subsection 4 and who is not otherwise prohibited from holding a moose permit. The
commissioner may authorize a permit holder to transfer the moose permit to a disabled
veteran identified by the permit holder or the permit holder may return the permit to the
department, which, in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner, shall provide
for the transfer of the permit to a disabled veteran. A transferor and a transferee of the
permit are subject to the elimination of any accumulated points under subsection 8 and the
3-year ineligibility period under subsection 5. Rules adopted under this subsection are
routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 1 - 132LR1536(03)